Mississippi, session 2026, HB571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-819, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-819.  (1)  It shall be unlawful for a foreign national, directly or through any other person, to make any contribution or any expenditure of money or other thing of value, or to promise expressly or impliedly to make any such contribution or expenditure, in connection with an election to any political office or in connection with any primary election, convention or caucus held to select candidates for any political office, or in connection with any state or local ballot measure. (2)  No person shall solicit, accept or receive any such contribution from a foreign national. (3)  The term "foreign national" means: (a)  A foreign national as defined in 22 USCS 611(b), except that the terms "foreign national" does not include any individual who is a citizen of the United States; or (b)  An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.